Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Wood Products Competitiveness Corporation

154.47-015.
Kentucky Wood Products Competitiveness Corporation — Governing board. [Repealed.]

154.47-020.
Meetings of board — Compensation — Officers. [Repealed.]

154.47-025.
Functions, duties, and responsibilities of board — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

154.47-030.
Board’s authority to contract. [Repealed.]

154.47-035.
Biennial status reports — Recommendation to General Assembly on hubs. [Repealed.]